South Carolina, session 2025-2026, H3320.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.  Chapter 1, Title 1 of the S.C. Code is amended by adding: Article 2 Standard Time for South Carolina Section 1-1-40.  The time known as Eastern Standard Time in South Carolina under the provisions of 15 U.S.C. Sections 260a through 264 is permanently the standard time in South Carolina with no further adjustments under state or federal law. Section 1-1-50.  The General Assembly acknowledges and takes notice under the provisions of 15 U.S.C. Section 260a(b) that states are preempted from changing or advancing time contrary to federal law. Additionally, because the State of South Carolina lies wholly within one time zone and under 15 U.S.C. Section 260a(a), South Carolina, by state law, may choose to exempt itself from Daylight Saving Time. Section 1-1-60.  The Attorney General of South Carolina on the effective date of this article, shall request a waiver from the United States Secretary of Transportation who, under 15 U.S.C. Section 260a(c), is charged with enforcing the provisions of 15 U.S.C. Section 260a in order to permit and approve South Carolina's permanent standard time to a year-round basis. If the waiver is not granted, the provisions of this article become null and void ten days after the Secretary of State is notified by the Attorney General that the waiver could not be obtained. SECTION 2.  This act takes effect upon approval by the Governor. ----XX----